Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Circuit Clerks

30A.010.
Clerk defined — Duties coextensive with Commonwealth — Subject to administrative control of Chief Justice.

For the purpose of KRS

30A.010

to

30A.190

, “clerk” means the Circuit Court clerk serving in his capacity as clerk of both the Circuit Court and the District Court.

As personnel within the Court of Justice, clerks are state officers whose duties are coextensive with the Commonwealth, and who are subject to the administrative control of the Chief Justice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 1, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.015.
Domestic violence training for circuit clerks and deputy clerks.

The Administrative Office of the Courts, under the direction of the Supreme Court, shall provide initial training courses and, at least once every two (2) years, continuing education courses for circuit clerks and deputy clerks concerning the dynamics of domestic violence, effects of domestic violence on adult and child victims, legal remedies for protection, lethality and risk issues, model protocols for addressing domestic violence, available community resources and victims services, and reporting requirements. The training shall be developed in consultation with legal, victims services, victim advocacy, and mental health professionals with an expertise in domestic violence.

Each clerk and deputy clerk shall successfully complete the training prescribed by the Supreme Court by rule.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 54, § 11, effective July 15, 1996.

30A.020.
Oath of clerk and deputies.

Every clerk and deputy, in addition to the oath prescribed by Section 228 of the Constitution, shall, before entering on the duties of his office, take the following oath in presence of the Circuit Court: “I,
_________ , do swear that I will well and truly discharge the duties of the office of
_______________________________________
County Circuit Court clerk, according to the best of my skill and judgment, making the due entries and records of all orders, judgments, decrees, opinions and proceedings of the court, and carefully filing and preserving in my office all books and papers which come to my possession by virtue of my office; and that I will not knowingly or willingly commit any malfeasance of office, and will faithfully execute the duties of my office without favor, affection or partiality, so help me God.” The fact that the oath has been administered shall be entered on the record of the Circuit Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 2, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.030.
Bond of clerks, deputies, and other personnel.

All clerks, deputy clerks, and other persons employed in the office of the clerk shall be bonded to the Commonwealth for the faithful performance of their duties and for the accounting of all funds which may come into their hands by virtue of their office. They shall be covered by the blanket bond for all elected or appointed state officials.

No other bond shall be required for performance of duty by the clerk, and any statute to the contrary is repealed to the extent of the conflict.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 3, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.040.
Office in each county — Branch offices — Office hours.

Every Circuit Court and every District Court shall have a clerk’s office in each county, and shall have such branch offices within the county as are approved by the Supreme Court. Minimum office hours of the clerk’s offices shall be determined by the Supreme Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 4.

30A.050.
Number and qualifications of deputy clerks and employees — Power of deputy clerks — Compensation.

The number and qualifications of deputy clerks and other employees in the office of each clerk shall be determined by the Administrative Office of the Courts after consultation with the clerk concerned. All deputies and employees of the clerk’s office shall be employees of the Commonwealth.

Deputy circuit clerks, authorized by and under the direction of the circuit clerk, shall have full power to perform such duties as may be performed by the circuit clerk; and any act of a deputy clerk is entitled to the same faith and credit as that of the clerk.

Deputy clerks and all other employees in the office of the clerk shall be compensated according to the pay schedule established by the Judicial Personnel System.

The clerk may employ and dismiss such deputies and other employees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 5, effective January 2, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A deputy Circuit Court clerk has the authority to certify as true copies various Circuit Court documents, such as indictments and warrants for applications for requisitions in extradition matters, where the deputy Circuit Court clerk has been duly authorized and supervised by the circuit clerk to perform such a statutory function.

OAG 80-174

.

Although deputies and employees of the circuit clerk’s office are state employees and personnel of the Court of Justice, they are not covered under the state merit system set forth in KRS Chapter 18 (repealed, now see KRS Chapter 18A).

OAG 80-608

.

The authority to determine job assignments and work shifts relating to deputy circuit clerks is under the immediate authority of the circuit clerk, subject to any applicable rules or requirements coming from the Supreme Court, or the chief justice as the executive head of the Court of Justice, or the administrative office of the courts with the approval of the Supreme Court.

OAG 80-646

.

The circuit clerk is a state officer as provided by KRS

30A.010

and so are his deputy clerks, whether employed part-time or full-time, as the deputy clerk is given the same powers and duties of the clerk under subsection (2) of this section and must take the oath of office and execute bond pursuant to KRS

30A.020

and

30A.030

, in spite of the fact that subsection (2) of this section indicates that deputies, along with other employees, are employees of the state.

OAG 82-351

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note, Judicial v. Legislative Power in Kentucky: A “Comity” of Errors, 71 Ky. L.J. 829 (1982-83).

30A.055.
Automated warrant system. [Repealed.]

30A.060.
Clerk to prepare bonds and to refuse insufficient surety — Authorization for preparation and acceptance of bail bonds by other public officers or employees.

Each clerk shall prepare in a proper manner every bond to be taken by or given before him or his court.

The clerk shall refuse any surety offered in a bond to be taken by him who is, in his opinion, insufficient.

The clerk shall prepare bail bonds as required by subsection (1) of this section; however, additional public officials and their employees shall be authorized by rule or order of the Chief Circuit Judge to prepare and accept bail bonds to be taken by the clerk or for his court. Such bail bonds shall have the same validity as if prepared or taken by the clerk.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 6; 1992, ch. 89, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 367, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

30A.070.
Clerk may administer oaths and take affidavits.

Every clerk may administer oaths, in or out of court, touching any matter in which an oath may be legally administered, and may take any affidavit requested or permitted in the progress of a proceeding in his court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 7, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.080.
Maintenance of records — Removal from county — Transfer by rule or order of Supreme Court.

Every clerk shall maintain all records, files, dockets, and indexes as are prescribed by statute or rule.

All necessary record books and all necessary supplies required by the clerk’s office shall be procured through the Administrative Office of the Courts and paid for by the Court of Justice.

No clerk shall permit the records or papers of his office to be taken out of his office except in case of invasion or insurrection, or other catastrophe, or pursuant to rule or order of court, and then he shall cause them to be returned as soon as the necessity for the removal ceases to exist.

Records may be permanently transferred from the clerk’s office by rule or order of the Supreme Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 8, effective January 2, 1978; 1998, ch. 606, § 35, effective July 15, 1998.

30A.090.
Collection of fees or charges.

Unless the plaintiff has established his right to prosecute as a poor person as provided by statute or rule, each clerk shall, when a proceeding is filed in his court, collect the filing fee fixed by law. He shall also collect any charges which have accrued during the progress of the action.

The clerk shall collect all other fees required by law or court rule or order.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 9, effective January 2, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A clerk is under no affirmative duty to collect the misdemeanor arrest fee payable to city policemen or a sheriff, but where the defendant is convicted and judgment of conviction and costs being entered, the defendant pays the fee to the clerk who pays the fee to the Department of Finance (now Finance Cabinet), then the arresting officer may collect his fee.

OAG 79-125

.

30A.100.
Assessment of costs.

At the termination of an action, every clerk shall assess the costs of each party and file it with the case. The assessment shall be subject to correction by the court by motion upon notice given.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 10, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.110.
Payment of jurors and witnesses — Clerk’s liability for advancements — Reports to the Finance and Administration Cabinet — Penalty.

Each clerk shall pay to each juror and to each witness the compensation allowed to him by law, under appropriations provided by the General Assembly and in accordance with procedures governing expenditures from appropriations. The clerk shall take a receipt for each payment made by him showing the date on which payment is made. A canceled check shall be the equivalent of a receipt. For the purpose of providing for such payments, the State Treasurer, on direction of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, shall advance to each clerk two (2) imprest funds: one for the payment of jurors which shall be sufficient for the period of service of each grand or petit jury panel, or both, but not to exceed a period of sixty (60) days; the other for the payment of Commonwealth witnesses, which shall be sufficient for a period of time not to exceed sixty (60) days.

Each clerk shall be liable on the clerk’s official bond to account for the full amounts advanced to the clerk under this section. Each clerk shall file a separate statement concerning each imprest fund with the Finance and Administration Cabinet, in such form as the cabinet prescribes, showing the amounts disbursed since the last preceding report, accompanied by a copy of the canceled check, or a receipt for each amount disbursed signed by the person to whom it was paid, and showing the date of the payment and such other information as the cabinet prescribes. These reports shall be forwarded to the cabinet within thirty (30) days after the end of the period for which funds are advanced.

Any clerk who fails to comply with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall be required to pay a penalty of five percent (5%) of all funds not so paid or accounted for.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 11, effective January 2, 1978; 2002, ch. 252, § 11, effective July 15, 2002.

30A.120.
Collection of fines and forfeitures — Semimonthly reports and payments to the Finance and Administration Cabinet — Delinquency.

Every clerk shall collect all fines and forfeitures imposed in District and Circuit Court, and shall issue receipts therefor.

At the close of business daily the clerk in each county shall deposit in a bank designated as a state depository the proceeds from fines and forfeitures, and within three (3) working days after the first and fifteenth of each month submit to the Finance and Administration Cabinet a report listing all fines and forfeitures collected, and shall pay over to the cabinet in the manner prescribed by the cabinet at the same time all costs, fines, forfeitures, and other moneys so reported.

Upon the failure of the clerk to submit to the cabinet, within the prescribed period, the required report and to pay over, at the same time, the costs, fines, forfeitures and other moneys collected, the cabinet shall immediately notify the Auditor of Public Accounts that the clerk concerned is delinquent in the matter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 12, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.125.
Circuit clerk to report final disposition of criminal case to Administrative Office of the Courts — Update of database within ninety days of disposition.

Each circuit clerk shall submit to the Administrative Office of the Courts, in a manner prescribed by the Administrative Office of the Courts, the final court disposition. Said disposition shall be inclusive of regulatory violations and traffic cases which are not subject to prepayment. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall update their database within ninety (90) days of the disposition. The update shall include information from the:

Offender level;

Prosecution/grand jury level;

Court disposition level;

Sentencing level; and

Informational and evaluational level.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 24, effective July 15, 1986.

30A.130.
Certification of copies of documents and records.

Every clerk shall prepare, attest and certify copies of all documents and records in his office upon payment of the charge established by statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 13, effective January 2, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A deputy Circuit Court clerk has the authority to certify as true copies various Circuit Court documents, such as indictments and warrants for applications for requisitions in extradition matters, where the deputy Circuit Court clerk has been duly authorized and supervised by the circuit clerk to perform such a statutory function.

OAG 80-174

.

30A.140.
Additional duties of clerk.

Every clerk shall perform such additional duties as may be prescribed by statute or court rule.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 14.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The District Court or Circuit Court, by rule, could direct the circuit clerk to handle moneys in those cases in which persons have been awarded civil judgments or restitution in criminal cases.

OAG 77-434

.

The clerk may be reimbursed for any actual expenses paid for out of the clerk’s private funds in connection with the taking of passport photographs; however, where the picture taking was a private venture, the clerk was subject to the rule that a public office cannot be used for personal and private profit.

OAG 82-181

.

While the county attorney or special prosecutor in District Court must prepare the subpoenas, the circuit clerk has the duty to sign and issue the subpoenas and put them in the hands of peace officers empowered to serve process, usually the county sheriff.

OAG 83-206

.

30A.145.
Clerks to send notices to State Board of Elections on incompetency determinations.

Each circuit clerk shall send certified notices of incompetency to the State Board of Elections within ten (10) days after the determination has become final with regard to any person before the courts of the county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 4, effective July 15, 1988.

30A.150.
Vacancy in office of clerk — Appointment of successor.

Whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of the clerk, the chief judge of the judicial circuit shall within thirty (30) days appoint a qualified successor to the office who shall serve until replaced as provided by Section 152 of the Constitution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 15, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.160.
Delivery of books and records to successor.

Upon the resignation, removal from office or expiration of the term of office of a clerk, he shall immediately deliver to his successor, or such other person as the court orders, all books, records, and other papers belonging to his office. For failure to do so he shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 16, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

30A.170.
Clerk ex officio a special circuit clerk of Commonwealth.

Each circuit clerk shall be, ex officio, a special circuit clerk of the Commonwealth, and as such shall perform the duties and services required by KRS

30A.180

, at such time and places, coextensive with the Commonwealth, as required by the Chief Justice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 17, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.180.
Assignment as special circuit clerk to fill vacancy.

In the event of a vacancy in the office of circuit clerk in any county, the Chief Justice may assign any other circuit clerk in the Commonwealth as special circuit clerk to fill the vacancy for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days, or until a person is appointed to fill the vacancy as provided by law, whichever occurs first.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 18, effective January 2, 1978.

30A.190.
Accounting by circuit clerk for all fines, fees, forfeitures, and costs collected.

All fees, fines, forfeitures, and costs in any District Court or Circuit Court case shall be collected and accounted for by the Circuit Court clerk and paid into the State Treasury, except that:

Sixty percent (60%) of any fines imposed for the violation of KRS Chapter 150 or KRS Chapter 235 shall when collected be paid into the fish and game fund;

Sixty percent (60%) of any fines imposed for the violation of KRS

433.753

,

433.757

, or

512.070

shall when collected be paid to the county in which the violation occurred;

Forty percent (40%) of any fines imposed for the violation of KRS

433.753

,

433.757

, or

512.070

shall, when collected, be paid to the agency issuing the citation; and

One hundred percent (100%) of any fines imposed for the violation of KRS

224.40-100

(5) and

224.99-010

(10) shall, when collected, be transferred to the treasurer of the county in which the violation occurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 25, effective January 2, 1978; 1998, ch. 275, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 342, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2021 ch. 137, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A clerk is under no affirmative duty to collect the misdemeanor arrest fee payable to city policemen or a sheriff, but where the defendant is convicted and judgment of conviction and costs being entered, the defendant pays the fee to the clerk who pays the fee to the Department of Finance (now Finance Cabinet), then the arresting officer may collect his fee.

OAG 79-125

.

Arrest fee money involves fees outside the range of this section.

OAG 79-545

.

While this section provides that the circuit clerk shall collect all fees, fines, forfeitures and costs in any District or Circuit Court and pay them into the state treasury, such fees were intended to embrace court generated fees, not fees earned by local law enforcement officers.

OAG 79-545

.

30A.200.
Moneys deposited with court clerks and payable to a third person.

All moneys which are deposited with the clerk and which are payable to a third person, not the Commonwealth, or which may become payable to such third person as a result of court action or otherwise shall:

Be logged in the appropriate record of the clerk and the person paying or depositing the money shall be given a receipt;

Be deposited daily in a bank approved as a state depository bank in a special escrow account or accounts subject to the clerk’s withdrawal as required in the daily course of the clerk’s business or as may be ordered by a court; and

Not be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 41 relating to the deposit of money in the State Treasury until by action of a court, such as forfeiture of a bond, the money is due and owing to the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 200, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 563, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 183, § 7, effective July 15, 2002.

30A.205.
Interest on deposits.

The bank accounts of the circuit clerk authorized by KRS

30A.200

shall accrue interest at such rate per annum upon the average daily deposit on hand at the close of banking hours as may be agreed upon by the bank and the Chief Justice or his designee. Interest accrued shall not be at a rate less than the interest paid on similar accounts of the Commonwealth in that bank.

Interest shall accrue to the state and be paid to the State Treasury by the circuit clerk every six (6) months in the same manner as other moneys due the state.

For services rendered by the depositories there shall be no charges made of any character or description.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 200, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

30A.210.
Rules.

The Supreme Court shall issue rules relating to the receipt, handling, deposit, and disbursal of moneys by the circuit clerk which are held in accounts covered by KRS

30A.200

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 200, § 3, effective June 17, 1978.

30A.250.
Expenditure of funds for liability insurance.

The Court of Justice may expend funds necessary to insure circuit clerks and their deputies against any liability arising out of an act or omission committed in the scope and course of performing legal duties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 4, effective May 12, 1979.

30A.260.
Payment to clerk by debit or credit card account — Imposition of fee if check or sight order dishonored.

A clerk may, but shall not be required to, accept payment of any fine, forfeiture, tax, or fee by debit or credit card account. If an individual chooses to pay a fine, forfeiture, tax, or fee by debit or credit card account, the clerk may recover the transaction fee charged by the issuer or acquirer of the account as part of and in addition to the original amount of the fine, forfeiture, tax, or fee.

Where a check or similar sight order for the payment of money is tendered to a clerk for payment of any fine, forfeiture, tax, or fee and that check or sight order is subsequently dishonored, the clerk may charge to the person who tendered the check or sight order a fee, not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25), in an amount set by the Supreme Court by rule.

Fees collected under subsection (2) of this section shall be deposited into the general fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 237, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.